District of Columbia statutes.
33-516

Repealed

Withdrawal or reduction of limited partner’s contribution; limited partner’s right to dissolve partnership.

Repealed.

Sept. 28, 1962, 76 Stat. 658, Pub. L. 87-716, § 16
Dec. 10, 1987, D.C. Law 7-49, § 1105, 34 DCR 6856
1981 Ed., § 41-216.
1973 Ed., § 41-416.